Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-170
Livestock Brand Act, how cited.

Sections 54-170 to 54-1,138 shall be known and may be cited as the Livestock Brand Act.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 213, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB435, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB768, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 1.
July 18, 2026